src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k27_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vøkstur
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: vøkstur
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: vøkstri
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: vakstrar
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: vøkstrir
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: vøkstrir
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: vøkstrum
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: vakstra
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: vøksturin
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: vøksturin
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: vøkstrinum
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: vakstrarins
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: vøkstrirnir
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: vøkstrirnar
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: vøkstrunum
    vøkstur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: vakstranna
